Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB472.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 45A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Foundation construction" means any necessary building and construction
materials:
1. Manufactured in the United States; and
2. Permanently incorporated as improvement to real property;
(b) "Governmental body" has the same meaning as in KRS 45A.030 and
includes a governmental body of a city, county, special district, or school
district;
(c) "Manufactured in the United States" means any iron, steel, or aluminum
product for which all manufacturing has taken place in the United States,
except metallurgical processes involving the refinement of steel additives,
regardless of the origin of a the subcomponents of foundational
construction materials;
(d) "Public works" has the same meaning as in KRS 45A.487; and
(e) "United States" means the United States of America and includes all
territory, continental or insular, subject to the jurisdiction of the United
States.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, each contract for the
foundation construction or maintenance of foundation construction for a public
building or public works made by a governmental body after August 1, 2026,
shall contain a provision that the iron, steel, or aluminum used or supplied as a
primary component in the performance of the contract and any subcontract shall
be manufactured in the United States, subject to the provisions of this section.
Page 1 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply if the purchasing agent of the
governmental body issues a waiver of the requirements of that subsection in
accordance with the following:
(a) A request for a waiver shall be filed with the purchasing agent of the
governmental body at least thirty (30) days before the bid or proposal
opening;
(b) The governmental body shall provide notice and an opportunity for public
comment on the request at least twenty (20) days before the bids or
proposals for the contract are opened. The notice shall:
1. Include all information available to the purchasing agent of the
governmental body;
2. Identify which provision of paragraph (c) of this subsection the waiver
request asserts; and
3. Be provided to parties interested in the contract by electronic means,
including on the official website of the governmental body;
(c) In determining whether to issue a waiver, the purchasing agent of the
governmental body shall consider whether:
1. The application of subsection (2) of this section would be inconsistent
with the public interest;
2. The iron, steel, or aluminum to be used or supplied in the
performance of the contract are not manufactured in the United States
in sufficient and reasonably available quantities or of a satisfactory
quality; or
3. The inclusion of iron, steel, or aluminum to be used or supplied in the
performance of the contract will increase the cost of the overall
contract by more than ten percent (10%); and
(d) The purchasing agent of the governmental body shall issue a decision on
Page 2 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
the waiver request no later than seven (7) days before the date set for
opening of the bids or proposal. The notification of this decision shall:
1. Immediately be sent to the person requesting the waiver, all persons
who submitted comments, and all persons who indicated interest in
bidding or submitting requests for proposals on the subject contract;
and
2. Immediately be published on the official website of the governmental
body and, if issued, a detailed justification for the waiver that
addresses the public comments received under paragraph (b) of this
subsection.
(4) A person shall be debarred under KRS 45A.035(2)(b) or 45A.360(1)(b) from
receiving any contract or subcontract with a governmental body if the person has
been found by a court or federal or state agency to have intentionally:
(a) Affixed a label bearing a "Made in America" inscription, or any inscription
with the same meaning, to any iron, steel, or aluminum used in projects to
which this section applies, that was sold in or shipped to the United States
and not manufactured in the United States; or
(b) Represented that any iron, steel, or aluminum used in projects to which this
section applies was manufactured in the United States when it was not
manufactured in the United States.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 56 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
All contracts made after August 1, 2026, by a state agency for the foundation
construction or maintenance of foundation construction for a state property or
building, building project, or industrial development project, shall comply with the
provisions set forth in Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
Page 3 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
READ AS FOLLOWS:
All contracts made after August 1, 2026, by a city, county, special district, or local
school district for the foundation construction or maintenance of foundation
construction for a public building or public works shall comply with the provisions set
forth in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 4. KRS 45A.343 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any local public agency may adopt the provisions of KRS 45A.345 to 45A.460. No
other statutes governing purchasing shall apply to a local public agency upon
adoption of these provisions.
(2) After July 15, 1994, any contract entered into by a local public agency, whether
under KRS 45A.345 to 45A.460 or any other authority, shall require the contractor
and all subcontractors performing work under the contract to:
(a) Reveal any final determination of a violation by the contractor or
subcontractor within the previous five (5) year period pursuant to KRS
Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 that apply to the contractor or
subcontractor; and
(b) Be in continuous compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 136, 139,
141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 that apply to the contractor or subcontractor for
the duration of the contract.
(3) A contractor's failure to reveal a final determination of a violation by the contractor
of KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 or to comply with these
statutes for the duration of the contract shall be grounds for the local public
agency's:
(a) Cancellation of the contract; and
(b) Disqualification of the contractor from eligibility for future contracts awarded
by the local public agency for a period of two (2) years.
(4) A subcontractor's failure to reveal a final determination of a violation by the
Page 4 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
subcontractor of KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 or to comply
with these statutes for the duration of the contract shall be grounds for the local
public agency's disqualification of the subcontractor from eligibility for future
contracts for a period of two (2) years.
(5) A local public agency shall follow the requirements of Sections 1 and 3 of this Act
regarding a contract for foundation construction or maintenance of foundation
construction for a public building or public works.
Section 5. KRS 45A.352 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A local public agency may enter into a guaranteed energy savings contract for
innovative solutions for energy conservation measures. The local public agency
shall submit a request for proposals. The request for proposals for competitive
procurement of guaranteed energy savings contracts shall include the following:
(a) The name and address of the governmental unit;
(b) The name, address, title, and phone number of a contact person;
(c) Notice indicating that the local public agency is requesting qualified providers
to propose energy conservation measures through a guaranteed energy savings
contract;
(d) The following evaluation criteria for assessing the proposals:
1. Construction management capabilities;
2. Technical approach to facilities included;
3. Financial attributes, as defined by total cost of contract and guaranteed
savings and provider's financial strength demonstrating ability to fulfill
the guarantee term; and
4. Provider's capability, personnel, track record, and demonstrated ability
to accomplish the contract;
(e) The date, time, and place where proposals must be received;
(f) Any other stipulations and clarifications the local public agency may require;
Page 5 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
and
(g) An overview prepared by the local public agency stating goals or objectives
specific to facility needs to be considered by the qualified providers who are
responding to the request. Detailed scope of construction is not required.
(2) Respondents to the request for proposal shall provide the following:
(a) A detailed list of the proposed energy conservation measures and the
guaranteed savings which shall be supported with calculations. Any
guaranteed energy and operational savings shall be determined by using one
of the measurement and verification methodologies listed in the United States
Department of Energy's "Measurement and Verification Guideline for Federal
Energy Projects" or in the "North American Energy Measurement and
Verification Protocol." If due to existing data limitations or the
nonconformance of specific project characteristics, none of the methods listed
in either the United States Department of Energy's "Measurement and
Verification Guideline for Federal Energy Projects" or in the "North
American Energy Measurement and Verification Protocol" is sufficient for
measuring guaranteed savings, the qualified provider shall develop an
alternate method that is compatible with one (1) of the two (2);
(b) The estimated cost of the proposed energy conservation measures including
engineering, construction, commissioning, measurement and verification,
annual reconciliation statements, and required on-going services; and
(c) Proposed method and costs of financing.
(3) The value for total cost of the contract minus the calculated savings from the energy
conservation measures listed in the qualified provider's proposal, shall be within
fifteen percent (15%) of the value for the total cost of the contract minus the
calculated savings after the final contract has been negotiated. If the difference
between the proposed and the final contract is not within fifteen percent (15%) and
Page 6 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
the local public agency and the qualified provider are unable to renegotiate the final
contract to reconcile the difference between the proposed and final contract values,
then the local public agency may:
(a) Stop negotiations with the current qualified provider; and
(b) Select an alternate provider.
(4) The local public agency may, as a component of the request for proposal, solicit and
negotiate additional maintenance services for the affected proposed energy
conservation measures. Additional services shall be subject to budget
appropriations on an annual basis and may be discontinued at any time over the
guarantee period with no negative impact to the guaranteed savings contract.
(5) The local public agency shall utilize the request for proposal process to enter into a
guaranteed energy savings contract. The local public agency may, at its discretion,
utilize a request for qualifications, provided that the local public agency solicits
qualification statements from multiple potentially qualified providers. The local
public agency shall use the qualification statements to select no fewer than two (2)
providers and each provider shall then be subject to the request-for-proposal
requirement provided in subsections (1) to (4) of this section.
(6) The local public agency shall select the provider best qualified to meet its needs.
The local public agency shall provide public notice of the meeting at which it
proposes to award a guaranteed energy savings contract, the name of the parties to
the proposed contract, and the purpose of the contract. The public notice shall be
made at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting. After reviewing the proposals, a
local public agency may enter into a guaranteed energy savings contract with a
qualified provider if it finds that the amount it would spend on the energy
conservation measures recommended in the proposal would not exceed the amount
to be saved in either energy or operational costs plus capital cost avoidance within
the term of the contract from the date of installation, if the recommendations in the
Page 7 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
proposal are followed.
(7) The guaranteed energy savings contract shall include a written guarantee of the
qualified provider that either the energy or operational costs savings plus capital
cost avoidance will meet or exceed the costs of the energy conservation measures
within the term of the contract. The qualified provider shall, on an annual basis,
reimburse the local public agency for any shortfall in guaranteed energy savings
projected in the contract. A qualified provider shall provide a sufficient bond to the
local public agency for the installation and the faithful performance of all the
measures included in the contract. The guaranteed energy savings contract may
provide for payments over a period of time, not to exceed the term of the contract.
(8) The qualified provider shall provide the local public agency with an annual
reconciliation statement. The statement shall disclose any shortfalls or surplus
between guaranteed energy and operational savings specified in the guaranteed
energy savings contract and actual energy and operational savings incurred during a
given guarantee year. The guarantee year shall consist of a twelve (12) month term
commencing from the time that the energy conservation measures became fully
operational. The qualified provider shall pay the local public agency any short fall
in the guaranteed energy and operation savings within thirty (30) days after the total
year savings have been determined. If there is a surplus in the actual guaranteed
energy and operational savings in a given year, that surplus savings may be carried
forward and applied against any possible savings shortfall in the following
guarantee year, except that the surplus carried forward is limited to a period not to
exceed one (1) year. If the qualified provider pays the local public agency for a
short fall in energy or operational savings incurred during a given guarantee year
and there is a surplus in energy or operational savings in future guarantee years, the
qualified provider shall bill the local public agency for an amount not to exceed the
amount of the short fall in the given guarantee year.
Page 8 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
(9) The use of capital cost avoidance shall be subject to the following restrictions:
(a) The amount expended shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the project cost;
and
(b) Capital cost avoidance shall be restricted to payment for permanent equipment
replacement as follows:
1. Storm windows or doors, multiglazed windows or doors, additional
glazing, and reduction in glass area;
2. Replacement of heating, ventilating, or air conditioning major
components or systems;
3. New lighting fixtures where required to achieve Illuminating
Engineering Society of North America (IES) standards, provided the
existing light fixtures shall have been determined to be obsolete and
incapable of achieving IES standards; and
4. Life safety system replacements or upgrades which shall have been
determined to be necessary to conform with existing state and local
codes and standards.
(10) The commissioner of education shall review, and approve or disapprove projects
from local school districts relating to energy conservation measures under a
guaranteed energy savings contract, on the basis of the following guidelines:
(a) The project design's compliance with technical, health, and safety standards as
required by administrative regulation;
(b) The availability of general funds, capital outlay allotments under KRS
157.420 or local and state funds from the Facilities Support Program of
Kentucky as provided by KRS 157.440, for projects that will use capital cost
avoidance;
(c) The appropriate use of capital outlay allotments under KRS 157.420, local
and state funds from the Facilities Support Program of Kentucky as provided
Page 9 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
by KRS 157.440, for projects using capital cost avoidance, based on the
project's compliance with the district's approved facility plan;
(d) The funding capability of the school district; and
(e) The financing mechanism and proper financing documentation.
(11) The request for proposal as provided in subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall be
deemed to satisfy the requirements set out in subsection (1) of Section 7 of this
Act[KRS 162.070], and shall not be subject to an award determination based on the
lowest competitive bid or a separate bidding process for each energy conservation
measure listed in the proposal.
(12) A guaranteed energy savings contract that does not involve construction or the
installation of physical improvements shall not require the approval of the
commissioner of education and shall not be subject to other requirements of this
section.
Section 6. KRS 65.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "local government" means city, county, urban-county,
consolidated local government, charter county, unified local government, or special
district.
(2) For all contracts awarded by a local government, the local government shall apply
the reciprocal preference for resident bidders described in KRS 45A.494.
(3) Sections 1 and 3 of this Act shall apply to all contracts awarded by a local
government for foundation construction or maintenance of foundation
construction for a public building or public works.
Section 7. KRS 162.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The contracts for the erection of new school buildings, additions and repairs to old
buildings, except additions or repairs not exceeding seven thousand five hundred
dollars ($7,500), shall be made by the board of education with the lowest and best
responsible bidder complying with the terms of the letting, after advertisement for
Page 10 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
competitive bids pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, but the board may reject any or all
bids. All necessary specifications and drawings shall be prepared for all such work.
The board shall advertise for bids on all supplies and equipment that it desires to
purchase, except where the amount of the purchase does not exceed seven thousand
five hundred dollars ($7,500), and shall accept the bid of the lowest and best bidder
taking into consideration the price and the reciprocal preference for resident bidders
under KRS 45A.494, but the board may reject any and all bids.
(2) Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act shall apply to all contracts for foundation
construction or foundation construction maintenance for a school building or
other public works.
Section 8. KRS 164A.575 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing boards of each institution may elect to purchase interest in real
property, contractual services, rentals of all types, supplies, materials, equipment,
printing, and services, except that competitive bids may not be required for:
(a) Contractual services where no competition exists;
(b) Food, clothing, equipment, supplies, or other materials to be used in
laboratory and experimental studies;
(c) Instructional materials available from only one (1) source;
(d) Where rates are fixed by law or ordinance;
(e) Library books;
(f) Commercial items that are purchased for resale;
(g) Professional, technical, scientific, or artistic services, but contracts shall be
submitted in accordance with KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725;
(h) All other commodities, equipment, and services which, in the reasonable
discretion of the board, are available from only one (1) source; and
(i) Interests in real property.
(2) Nothing in this section shall deprive the boards from negotiating with vendors who
Page 11 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
maintain a General Services Administration price agreement with the United States
of America or any agency thereof, provided, however, that no contract executed
under this provision shall authorize a price higher than is contained in the contract
between General Services Administration and the vendor affected.
(3) The governing board shall require the institution to take and maintain inventories of
plant and equipment.
(4) The governing board shall establish procedures to identify items of common
general usage among all departments to foster volume purchasing. It shall establish
and enforce schedules for purchasing supplies, materials, and equipment.
(5) The governing board shall have power to salvage, to exchange, and to condemn
supplies, equipment, and real property.
(6) Upon the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the
governing board may purchase or otherwise acquire all real property determined to
be needed for the institution's use. The amount paid shall not exceed the fair market
value as determined by a qualified appraiser or the value set by the eminent domain
procedure. Any real property acquired under this section shall be in name of the
Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the institution.
(7) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 56.806, the governing board may renegotiate the cost
of a lease after the expiration of the lease term and any renewal terms
provided in the lease prior to any renewal not provided for in the terms of the
lease.
(b) Except when a lease incorporates a lease-purchase under KRS 56.806, the
governing board shall reserve the right to cancel a lease upon at least thirty
(30) days' written notice.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 56.823(2) and (3), any lease renewals, except automatic
renewals permitted under KRS 56.803, 56.805(2), and 56.806(1), for which
the annual rental cost will exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000)
Page 12 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee in the
same format as set out in KRS 56.823(2).
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 56.813, a public college or university may pay for
improvements to leased property costing in excess of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) but less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in a lump sum upon
approval of its board using non-general fund appropriations and without
incurring debt.
(8) The governing board shall sell or otherwise dispose of all real or personal property
of the institution which is not needed or has become unsuitable for public use, or
would be more suitable consistent with the public interest for some other use, as
determined by the board. The determination of the board shall be set forth in an
order, and shall be reached only after review of a written request by the institution
desiring to dispose of the property. Such request shall describe the property and
state the reasons why the institution believes disposal should be effected. All
instruments required by law to be recorded which convey any interest in any such
real property so disposed of shall be executed and signed by the appropriate officer
of the board. Unless the board deems it in the best interest of the institution to
proceed otherwise, all such real or personal property shall be sold either by
invitation of sealed bids or by public auction; provided, however, that the selling
price of any interest in real property shall not be less than the fair market value
thereof as determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the
Transportation Cabinet for such requirements of that department.
(9) Real property or any interest therein may, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter
45A, be purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired from any officer or employee of
any board of the institution, based upon a written application by the grantor or
lessor approved by the board, that the employee has not either himself or herself, or
through any other person, influenced or attempted to influence either the board
Page 13 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
requesting the purchase of the property. In any case in which such an acquisition is
consummated, the said request and finding shall be recorded and kept by the
Secretary of State along with the other documents recorded pursuant to the
provisions of KRS Chapter 56.
(10) (a) As used in this section, "construction manager-agency," "construction
management-at-risk," "design-bid-build," "design-build," and "construction
manager-general contractor" shall have the same meaning as in KRS
45A.030.
(b) For capital construction projects, the procurement may be on a total design-
bid-build basis, a design-build basis, construction manager-general contractor
basis, or construction management-at-risk basis, whichever in the judgment of
the board offers the best value to the taxpayer. Best value shall be determined
in accordance with KRS 45A.070. Proposals shall be reviewed by the
institution's engineering staff to assure quality and value, and compliance with
procurement procedures. All specifications shall be written to promote
competition. Services for projects delivered on the design-build basis,
construction manager-general contractor basis, or construction management-
at-risk basis shall be procured in accordance with KRS 45A.180, KRS
45A.183, and the regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS 45A.180.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit the procurement of construction
manager-agency services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 45A.185, for all capital construction projects, bidder
security for competitive sealed bidding for construction contracts shall only be
required when the price is estimated to exceed one million dollars
($1,000,000).
(11) The governing board shall attempt in every practicable way to insure the
institution's supplying its real needs at the lowest possible cost. To accomplish this
Page 14 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
the board may enter into cooperative agreements with other public or private
institutions of education or health care.
(12) The governing board shall have control and supervision over all purchases of
energy consuming equipment, supplies, and related equipment purchased or
acquired by the institution, and shall designate by regulation the manner in which
an energy consuming item will be purchased so as to promote energy conservation
and acquisition of energy efficient products.
(13) The governing board may negotiate directly for the purchase of contractual
services, supplies, materials, or equipment in bona fide emergencies regardless of
estimated costs. The existence of the emergency must be fully explained, in writing,
by the vice president responsible for business affairs and such explanation must be
approved by the institution president. The letter and approval shall be filed with the
record of all such purchases. Where practical, standard specifications shall be
followed in making emergency purchases. A good faith effort shall be made to
effect a competitively established price for emergency purchases.
(14) (a) All governing boards that purchase agricultural products, as defined by KRS
45A.630, shall, on or before January 1 of each year, provide a report to the
Legislative Research Commission and to the Department of Agriculture
describing the types, quantities, and costs of each product purchased. The
report shall be completed on a form provided by the department.
(b) If purchasing agricultural products, a governing board shall encourage the
purchase of Kentucky-grown agricultural products in accordance with KRS
45A.645. If a governing board purchases agricultural products through a
contract with a vendor or food service provider, the contract shall require that
if Kentucky-grown agricultural products are purchased, the products shall be
purchased in accordance with KRS 45A.645. Only contracts entered into or
renewed after July 15, 2008, shall be required to comply with the provisions
Page 15 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
of this subsection.
(c) All governing boards that purchase Kentucky-grown agricultural products
shall, on or before January 1 of each year, provide a report to the Legislative
Research Commission and to the Department of Agriculture describing the
types, quantities, and costs of each product purchased. The report shall be
completed on a form provided by the department.
(15) Notwithstanding KRS 45.760, the governing board may authorize a capital
construction project or a major item of equipment even though it is not specifically
listed in any branch budget bill, subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) The full cost shall be funded solely by non-general fund appropriations;
(b) Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for
another purpose shall not be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the
project or major item of equipment. Moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any
existing program and shall not require the use of any current general funds
specifically dedicated to existing programs; and
(c) The institution's president, or designee, shall submit the project or major item
of equipment to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for
review as provided by KRS 45.800.
(16) Governing boards shall apply the reciprocal resident bidder preference described in
KRS 45A.494 prior to the award of any contract.
(17) Governing boards may authorize the use of reverse auctions as defined in KRS
45A.070 for the procurement of goods and leases.
(18) Sections 1 and 3 of this Act shall apply to all contracts issued by a governing
board for foundation construction and maintenance of foundation construction
for a public building or other public works.
Section 9. KRS 176.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act shall apply to all contracts issued by the
Page 16 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
department.
(2) After surveys, plans, specifications and estimates have been completed for any road
or section thereof, and the type and character of the road has been determined, and
the right-of-way obtained, the bureau shall advertise by publication pursuant to
KRS Chapter 424, for bids on the work, and may contract for the purchase of all
materials necessary for the construction and maintenance of roads.
(3)[(2)] Before advertising for bids for the construction or reconstruction of any
highway, the department may determine the type of improvement desired, and may
advertise and receive bids for only the types determined. The advertisement shall
make it generally known that the work is to be done, and shall state the place where
the bidders may examine the plans and specifications.
Section 10. KRS 176.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act shall apply to all contracts issued by the
department.
(2) Each bidder shall accompany his or her bid with a bond or certified check payable
to the State Treasurer for a reasonable sum, fixed by the department, guaranteeing
that he or she will enter into a contract with the department for doing the work if
the work is awarded to him or her.
(3)[(2)] Bids shall be opened publicly at the time and place designated in the
invitation for bids. At the time the bids are opened, the department shall announce
the department's engineer's estimate and make it a part of the department's records
pertaining to the letting of any highway construction project contract for which bids
were received. Each bid, together with the name of the bidder and the department's
engineer's estimate, shall be recorded and open to public inspection.
(4)[(3)] The contract shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder. The department
may require bonds from any contractor to secure the performance of any contract or
may require security by any other means it deems advisable.
Page 17 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
(5)[(4)] The department may reject any bid when it finds it for the best interest of the
state to do so. When all bids are rejected, the department shall advertise for new
bids as in the first place.
Section 11. KRS 424.260 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except where a statute specifically fixes a larger sum as the minimum for a
requirement of advertisement for bids, no city, county, or district, or board or
commission of a city or county, or sheriff or county clerk, may make a contract,
lease, or other agreement for:
(a) Materials;
(b) Supplies, except perishable foods such as meat, poultry, fish, egg products,
fresh vegetables, and fresh fruits;
(c) Equipment; or
(d) Contractual services other than professional;
involving an expenditure of more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) without first
making newspaper advertisement for bids. The advertisement for bids shall
include notice that Sections 1 and 3 of this Act apply to all contracts involving
foundation construction or maintenance of foundation construction for a public
building or other public works. This subsection shall not apply to the transfer of
property between governmental agencies as authorized in KRS 82.083(4)(a).
(2) If the fiscal court requires that the sheriff or county clerk advertise for bids on
expenditures of less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), the fiscal court
requirement shall prevail.
(3) (a) Nothing in this statute shall limit or restrict the ability of a local school district
to acquire supplies and equipment outside of the bidding procedure if those
supplies and equipment meet the specifications of the contracts awarded by
the Office of Material and Procurement Services in the Office of the
Controller within the Finance and Administration Cabinet or a federal, local,
Page 18 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
or cooperative agency and are available for purchase elsewhere at a lower
price. A board of education may purchase those supplies and equipment
without advertising for bids if, prior to making the purchases, the board of
education obtains certification from the district's finance or purchasing officer
that the items to be purchased meet the standards and specifications fixed by
state price contract, federal (GSA) price contract, or the bid of another school
district whose bid specifications allow other districts to utilize their bids, and
that the sales price is lower than that established by the various price contract
agreements or available through the bid of another school district whose bid
specifications would allow the district to utilize their bid.
(b) The procedures set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be
available to the district for any specific item once the bidding procedure has
been initiated by an invitation to bid and a publication of specifications for
that specific item has been published. In the event that all bids are rejected,
the district may again avail itself of the provisions of paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(4) This requirement shall not apply in an emergency if the chief executive officer of
the city, county, or district has duly certified that an emergency exists, and has filed
a copy of the certificate with the chief financial officer of the city, county, or
district, or if the sheriff or the county clerk has certified that an emergency exists,
and has filed a copy of the certificate with the clerk of the court where his or her
necessary office expenses are fixed pursuant to KRS 64.345 or 64.530, or if the
superintendent of the board of education has duly certified that an emergency
exists, and has filed a copy of the certificate with the chief state school officer.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply for the purchase of
wholesale electric power for resale to the ultimate customers of a municipal utility
organized under KRS 96.550 to 96.900.
Page 19 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1065
(6) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to purchases for products or services
made pursuant to KRS 82.084.
Section 12. Sections 1 to 3 of this Act may be cited as the Kentucky Buy
American Act.
Page 20 of 20
BR106500.100 - 1065 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed